Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 96 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Eligible electric generating facility" has the same meaning as in KRS
278.465;
(b) "Merchant electric generating facility" has the same meaning as in KRS
278.700;
(c) "Net metering" has the same meaning as in KRS 278.465; and
(d) 1. "Solar electric generating facility" means any:
a. Solar powered merchant electric generating facility;
b. Solar powered electric generating facility that is owned or
operated by a municipality or combined water and electric plant
board operating under this chapter; and
c. Solar powered electric generating facility that is owned or
operated by a utility or electric cooperative regulated by the
Public Service Commission under KRS Chapter 278 or 279.
2. "Solar electric generating facility" does not include any eligible
electric generating facility used for net metering.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no utility operating under
the provisions of this chapter shall construct a facility that generates electricity
using solar energy if constructing the facility would result in more than one
percent (1%) of the total land area of any county where the proposed construction
is to be located being occupied by solar electric generating facilities.
Section 2. KRS 278.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) No person, partnership, public or private corporation, or combination thereof
Page 1 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
shall commence providing utility service to or for the public or begin the
construction of any plant, equipment, property, or facility for furnishing to the
public any of the services enumerated in KRS 278.010, except:
1. Retail electric suppliers for service connections to electric-consuming
facilities located within its certified territory;
2. Ordinary extensions of existing systems in the usual course of business;
or
3. A water district created under KRS Chapter 74 or a water association
formed under KRS Chapter 273 that undertakes a waterline extension or
improvement project if the water district or water association is a Class
A or B utility as defined in the uniform system of accounts established
by the commission according to KRS 278.220 and:
a. The water line extension or improvement project will not cost
more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); or
b. The water district or water association will not, as a result of the
water line extension or improvement project, incur obligations
requiring commission approval as required by KRS 278.300.
In either case, the water district or water association shall not, as a result
of the water line extension or improvement project, increase rates to its
customers;
until that person has obtained from the Public Service Commission a
certificate that public convenience and necessity require the service or
construction.
(b) Upon the filing of an application for a certificate, and after any public hearing
which the commission may in its discretion conduct for all interested parties,
the commission may issue or refuse to issue the certificate, or issue it in part
and refuse it in part, except that the commission shall not refuse or modify an
Page 2 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
application submitted under KRS 278.023 without consent by the parties to
the agreement.
(c) The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct
a base load electric generating facility, may consider the policy of the General
Assembly to foster and encourage use of Kentucky coal by electric utilities
serving the Commonwealth.
(d) The commission, when considering an application for a certificate to construct
an electric transmission line, may consider the interstate benefits expected to
be achieved by the proposed construction or modification of electric
transmission facilities in the Commonwealth.
(e) Unless exercised within one (1) year from the grant thereof, exclusive of any
delay due to the order of any court or failure to obtain any necessary grant or
consent, the authority conferred by the issuance of the certificate of
convenience and necessity shall be void, but the beginning of any new
construction or facility in good faith within the time prescribed by the
commission and the prosecution thereof with reasonable diligence shall
constitute an exercise of authority under the certificate.
(2) For the purposes of this section, construction of any electric transmission line of
one hundred thirty-eight (138) kilovolts or more and of more than five thousand
two hundred eighty (5,280) feet in length shall not be considered an ordinary
extension of an existing system in the usual course of business and shall require a
certificate of public convenience and necessity. However, ordinary extensions of
existing systems in the usual course of business not requiring such a certificate shall
include:
(a) The replacement or upgrading of any existing electric transmission line; or
(b) The relocation of any existing electric transmission line to accommodate
construction or expansion of a roadway or other transportation infrastructure;
Page 3 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
or
(c) An electric transmission line that is constructed solely to serve a single
customer and that will pass over no property other than that owned by the
customer to be served.
(3) Prior to granting a certificate of public convenience and necessity to construct
facilities to provide the services set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f), the commission
shall require the applicant to provide a surety bond, or a reasonable guaranty that
the applicant shall operate the facilities in a reasonable and reliable manner for a
period of at least five (5) years. The surety bond or guaranty shall be in an amount
sufficient to ensure the full and faithful performance by the applicant or its
successors of the obligations and requirements of this chapter and of all applicable
federal and state environmental requirements. However, no surety bond or guaranty
shall be required for an applicant that is a water district or water association or for
an applicant that the commission finds has sufficient assets to ensure the continuity
of sewage service.
(4) No utility shall exercise any right or privilege under any franchise or permit, after
the exercise of that right or privilege has been voluntarily suspended or
discontinued for more than one (1) year, without first obtaining from the
commission, in the manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of
convenience and necessity authorizing the exercise of that right or privilege.
(5) No utility shall apply for or obtain any franchise, license, or permit from any city or
other governmental agency until it has obtained from the commission, in the
manner provided in subsection (1) of this section, a certificate of convenience and
necessity showing that there is a demand and need for the service sought to be
rendered.
(6) No person shall acquire or transfer ownership of, or control, or the right to control,
any utility under the jurisdiction of the commission by sale of assets, transfer of
Page 4 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
stock, or otherwise, or abandon the same, without prior approval by the
commission. The commission shall grant its approval if the person acquiring the
utility has the financial, technical, and managerial abilities to provide reasonable
service.
(7) No individual, group, syndicate, general or limited partnership, association,
corporation, joint stock company, trust, or other entity (an "acquirer"), whether or
not organized under the laws of this state, shall acquire control, either directly or
indirectly, of any utility furnishing utility service in this state, without having first
obtained the approval of the commission. Any acquisition of control without prior
authorization shall be void and of no effect. As used in this subsection, the term
"control" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or
cause the direction of the management and policies of a utility, whether through the
ownership of voting securities, by effecting a change in the composition of the
board of directors, by contract or otherwise. Control shall be presumed to exist if
any individual or entity, directly or indirectly, owns ten percent (10%) or more of
the voting securities of the utility. This presumption may be rebutted by a showing
that ownership does not in fact confer control. Application for any approval or
authorization shall be made to the commission in writing, verified by oath or
affirmation, and be in a form and contain the information as the commission
requires. The commission shall approve any proposed acquisition when it finds that
the same is to be made in accordance with law, for a proper purpose and is
consistent with the public interest. The commission may make investigation and
hold hearings in the matter as it deems necessary, and thereafter may grant any
application under this subsection in whole or in part and with modification and
upon terms and conditions as it deems necessary or appropriate. The commission
shall grant, modify, refuse, or prescribe appropriate terms and conditions with
respect to every such application within sixty (60) days after the filing of the
Page 5 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
application therefor, unless it is necessary, for good cause shown, to continue the
application for up to sixty (60) additional days. The order continuing the application
shall state fully the facts that make continuance necessary. In the absence of that
action within that period of time, any proposed acquisition shall be deemed to be
approved.
(8) Subsection (7) of this section shall not apply to any acquisition of control of any:
(a) Utility which derives a greater percentage of its gross revenue from business
in another jurisdiction than from business in this state if the commission
determines that the other jurisdiction has statutes or rules which are applicable
and are being applied and which afford protection to ratepayers in this state
substantially equal to that afforded such ratepayers by subsection (7) of this
section;
(b) Utility by an acquirer who directly, or indirectly through one (1) or more
intermediaries, controls, or is controlled by, or is under common control with,
the utility, including any entity created at the direction of such utility for
purposes of corporate reorganization; or
(c) Utility pursuant to the terms of any indebtedness of the utility, provided the
issuance of indebtedness was approved by the commission.
(9) In a proceeding on an application filed pursuant to this section, any interested
person, including a person over whose property the proposed transmission line will
cross, may request intervention, and the commission shall, if requested, conduct a
public hearing in the county in which the transmission line is proposed to be
constructed, or, if the transmission line is proposed to be constructed in more than
one county, in one of those counties. The commission shall issue its decision no
later than ninety (90) days after the application is filed, unless the commission
extends this period, for good cause, to one hundred twenty (120) days. The
commission may utilize the provisions of KRS 278.255(3) if, in the exercise of its
Page 6 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
discretion, it deems it necessary to hire a competent, qualified and independent firm
to assist it in reaching its decision. The issuance by the commission of a certificate
that public convenience and necessity require the construction of an electric
transmission line shall be deemed to be a determination by the commission that, as
of the date of issuance, the construction of the line is a prudent investment.
(10) The commission shall not approve any application under subsection (6) or (7) of
this section for the transfer of control of a utility described in KRS 278.010(3)(f)
unless the commission finds, in addition to findings required by those subsections,
that the person acquiring the utility has provided evidence of financial integrity to
ensure the continuity of sewage service in the event that the acquirer cannot
continue to provide service.
(11) The commission shall not accept for filing an application requesting authority to
abandon facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease
providing services unless the applicant has provided written notice of the filing to
the following:
(a) Kentucky Division of Water;
(b) Office of the Attorney General; and
(c) The county judge/executive, mayor, health department, planning and zoning
commission, and public sewage service provider of each county and each city
in which the utility provides utility service.
(12) The commission may grant any application requesting authority to abandon
facilities that provide services as set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(f) or to cease
providing services upon terms and conditions as the commission deems necessary
or appropriate, but not before holding a hearing on the application and no earlier
than ninety (90) days from the date of the commission's acceptance of the
application for filing, unless the commission finds it necessary for good cause to act
upon the application earlier.
Page 7 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
(13) (a) The commission shall not grant an application for a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for a utility to construct any facilities that use
solar energy to provide the services set forth in KRS 278.010(3)(a) if
granting the application would result in more than one percent (1%) of the
total land area of any county where the proposed construction is to be
located being occupied by solar electric generating facilities.
(b) As used in this subsection:
1. "Solar electric generating facility" means any:
a. Solar powered merchant electric generating facility, as that term
is defined in KRS 278.700;
b. Solar powered electric generating facility owned or operated by a
municipality or combined water and electric plant board
operating under KRS Chapter 96; and
c. Solar powered electric generating facility that is owned or
operated by a utility or electric cooperative regulated by the
commission under this chapter or KRS Chapter 279; and
2. "Solar electric generating facility" does not include any eligible
electric generating facility used for net metering, as those terms are
defined in KRS 278.465.
(14) If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or
applications of this section which can be given effect without the invalid provision
or application, and to that end the provisions are declared to be severable.
Section 3. KRS 278.706 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Any person seeking to obtain a construction certificate from the board to construct a
merchant electric generating facility shall file an application at the office of the
Public Service Commission.
Page 8 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
(2) A completed application shall include the following:
(a) The name, address, and telephone number of the person proposing to
construct and own the merchant electric generating facility;
(b) A full description of the proposed site, including a map showing the distance
of the proposed site from residential neighborhoods, the nearest residential
structures, schools, and public and private parks that are located within a two
(2) mile radius of the proposed facility;
(c) Evidence of public notice that shall include the location of the proposed site
and a general description of the project, state that the proposed construction is
subject to approval by the board, and provide the telephone number and
address of the Public Service Commission. Public notice shall be given within
thirty (30) days immediately preceding the application filing to:
1. Landowners whose property borders the proposed site; and
2. The general public in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or
municipality in which the facility is proposed to be located;
(d) A statement certifying that the proposed plant will be in compliance with all
local ordinances and regulations concerning noise control and with any local
planning and zoning ordinances. The statement shall also disclose setback
requirements established by the planning and zoning commission as provided
under KRS 278.704(3);
(e) If the facility is not proposed to be located on a site of a former coal
processing plant and the facility will use on-site waste coal as a fuel source or
in an area where a planning and zoning commission has established a setback
requirement pursuant to KRS 278.704(3), a statement that the exhaust stack of
the proposed facility and any wind turbine is at least one thousand (1,000) feet
from the property boundary of any adjoining property owner and all proposed
structures or facilities used for generation of electricity are two thousand
Page 9 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
(2,000) feet from any residential neighborhood, school, hospital, or nursing
home facility, unless facilities capable of generating ten megawatts (10MW)
or more currently exist on the site. If the facility is proposed to be located on a
site of a former coal processing plant and the facility will use on-site waste
coal as a fuel source, a statement that the proposed site is compatible with the
setback requirements provided under KRS 278.704(5). If the facility is
proposed to be located in a jurisdiction that has established setback
requirements pursuant to KRS 278.704(3), a statement that the proposed site
is in compliance with those established setback requirements;
(f) A complete report of the applicant's public involvement program activities
undertaken prior to the filing of the application, including:
1. The scheduling and conducting of a public meeting in the county or
counties in which the proposed facility will be constructed at least
ninety (90) days prior to the filing of an application, for the purpose of
informing the public of the project being considered and receiving
comment on it;
2. Evidence that notice of the time, subject, and location of the meeting
was published in the newspaper of general circulation in the county, and
that individual notice was mailed to all owners of property adjoining the
proposed project at least two (2) weeks prior to the meeting; and
3. Any use of media coverage, direct mailing, fliers, newsletters, additional
public meetings, establishment of a community advisory group, and any
other efforts to obtain local involvement in the siting process;
(g) A summary of the efforts made by the applicant to locate the proposed facility
on a site where existing electric generating facilities are located;
(h) Proof of service of a copy of the application upon the chief executive officer
of each county and municipal corporation in which the proposed facility is to
Page 10 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
be located, and upon the chief officer of each public agency charged with the
duty of planning land use in the jurisdiction in which the facility is proposed
to be located;
(i) An analysis of the proposed facility's projected effect on the electricity
transmission system in Kentucky;
(j) An analysis of the proposed facility's economic impact on the affected region
and the state;
(k) A detailed listing of all violations by it, or any person with an ownership
interest, of federal or state environmental laws, rules, or administrative
regulations, whether judicial or administrative, where violations have resulted
in criminal convictions or civil or administrative fines exceeding five
thousand dollars ($5,000). The status of any pending action, whether judicial
or administrative, shall also be submitted;
(l) A site assessment report as specified in KRS 278.708. The applicant may
submit and the board may accept documentation of compliance with the
National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA) rather than a site assessment
report;[ and]
(m) A decommissioning plan that shall describe how the merchant electric
generating facility will be decommissioned and dismantled following the end
of its useful life. The decommissioning plan shall, at a minimum, include
plans to:
1. Unless otherwise requested by the landowner, remove all above-ground
facilities;
2. Unless otherwise requested by the landowner, remove any underground
components and foundations of above-ground facilities. Facilities
removed under this subparagraph shall be removed to a depth of three
(3) feet below the surface grade of the land in or on which the
Page 11 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
component was installed, unless the landowner and the applicant
otherwise agree to a different depth;
3. Return the land to a substantially similar state as it was prior to the
commencement of construction;
4. Unless otherwise requested by the landowner, leave any interconnection
or other facilities in place for future use at the completion of the
decommissioning process;
5. Secure a bond or other similar security for the project to assure financial
performance of the decommissioning obligation, provided that:
a. The amount of the proposed bond or similar security shall be
determined by an independent, licensed engineer who is
experienced in the decommissioning of solar electric generating
facilities and has no financial interest in either the merchant
electric generating facility or any parcel of land upon which the
merchant electric generating facility is located. The proposed
amount of the bond or similar security shall be either:
i. The net present value of the total estimated cost of
completing the decommissioning plan, less the current net
salvage value of the merchant electric generating facility's
components; or
ii. The bond amount required by a county or municipal
government that has established a decommissioning bond
requirement or similar security obligation in the county or
municipality where the merchant electric generating facility
will be located. If the facility will be located in more than
one (1) county or municipality that has established a
decommissioning bond or similar security obligation, then
Page 12 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
the higher amount shall be required for the facility;
b. The bond or other similar security names:
i. For property that is leased by the applicant, each landowner
from whom the applicant leases land and the Energy and
Environment Cabinet as the primary co-beneficiaries; or
ii. For property that is owned by the applicant, the Energy and
Environment Cabinet as the primary beneficiary;
c. If the merchant electric generating facility is to be located in a
county or municipality that has not established a decommissioning
bond or other similar security obligation, the bond or other similar
security shall name the county or municipality as a secondary
beneficiary with the county's or municipality's consent;
d. The bond or other similar security shall be provided by an
insurance company or surety that shall at all times maintain at least
an "Excellent" rating as measured by the AM Best rating agency
or an investment grade credit rating by any national credit rating
agency and, if available, shall be noncancelable by the provider or
the customer until completion of the decommissioning plan or
until a replacement bond is secured; and
e. The bond or other similar security shall provide that at least thirty
(30) days prior to its cancellation or lapse, the surety shall notify
the applicant, its successor or assign, each landowner, the Energy
and Environment Cabinet, and the county or city in which the
facility is located of the impending cancellation or lapse. The
notice shall specify the reason for the cancellation or lapse and
provide any of the parties, either jointly or separately, the
opportunity to cure the cancellation or lapse prior to it becoming
Page 13 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
effective. The applicant, its successor, or its assign, shall be
responsible for all costs incurred by all parties to cure the
cancellation or lapse of the bond. Each landowner, or the Energy
and Environment Cabinet with the prior approval of each
landowner, may make a demand on the bond and initiate and
complete the decommissioning plan.
6. Communicate with each affected landowner at the end of the merchant
electric generating facility's useful life so that any requests of the
landowner that are in addition to the minimum requirements set forth in
this paragraph and in addition to any other requirements specified in the
lease with the landowner may, in the sole discretion of the applicant or
its successor or assign, be accommodated; and
7. Incorporate the requirements of subparagraphs 1. to 6. of this paragraph
into the applicant's leases with landowners;
(n) A statement certifying that no portion of a proposed construction site for a
solar powered merchant electric generating facility or any transmission
facilities constructed to serve a solar electric generating facility will be
located on land that was previously acquired by the applicant or by a
commission-regulated utility through eminent domain pursuant to this
chapter or KRS Chapter 279 or 416; and
(o) 1. A statement certifying that approval of the proposed site would not
result in more than one percent (1%) of the total land area of any
county where the proposed site is to be located being occupied by solar
electric generating facilities.
2. As used in this paragraph:
a. "Solar electric generating facility" means any:
i. Solar powered merchant electric generating facility;
Page 14 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
ii. Solar powered electric generating facility that is owned or
operated by a municipality or combined water and electric
plant board operating under KRS Chapter 96; and
iii. Solar powered electric generating facility that is owned or
operated by a utility or electric cooperative regulated by the
commission under this chapter or KRS Chapter 279; and
b. "Solar electric generating facility" does not include any eligible
electric generating facility used for net metering as those terms
are defined in KRS 278.465.
(3) Application fees for a construction certificate shall be set by the board and
deposited into a trust and agency account to the credit of the commission.
(4) Replacement of a merchant electric generating facility with a like facility, or the
repair, modification, retrofitting, enhancement, or reconfiguration of a merchant
electric generating facility shall not, for the purposes of this section and KRS
224.10-280, 278.704, 278.708, 278.710, and 278.712, constitute construction of a
merchant electric generating facility.
(5) The board shall promulgate administrative regulations prescribing fees to pay
expenses associated with its review of applications filed with it pursuant to KRS
278.700 to 278.716. All application fees collected by the board shall be deposited in
a trust and agency account to the credit of the Public Service Commission. If a
majority of the members of the board find that an applicant's initial fees are
insufficient to pay the board's expenses associated with the application, including
the board's expenses associated with legal review thereof, the board shall assess a
supplemental application fee to cover the additional expenses. An applicant's failure
to pay a fee assessed pursuant to this subsection shall be grounds for denial of the
application.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 416 IS CREATED TO
Page 15 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1216
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, no land condemned by eminent
domain under this chapter or any other grant of condemnation authority under state
law shall be used for the construction of a facility that generates electricity using solar
energy or any transmission facility constructed to serve a facility that generates
electricity using solar energy.
Section 5. KRS 416.570 is amended to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in KRS 416.560, a condemnor seeking to condemn
property or the use and occupation thereof, shall file a verified petition in the Circuit
Court of the county in which all or the greater portion of the property sought to be
condemned is located, which petition shall state that it is filed under the provisions of
KRS 416.550 to 416.670 and shall contain, in substance:
(1) Allegations sufficient to show that the petitioner is entitled, under the provisions of
applicable law, to exercise the right of eminent domain and to condemn the
property, or the use and occupation thereof, sought to be taken in such proceedings;
(2) A statement certifying that the proposed condemnation will not violate Section 4
of this Act;
(3) A particular description of the property and the use and occupation thereof sought
to be condemned; and
(4)[(3)] An application to the court to appoint commissioners to award the amount of
compensation the owner of the property sought to be condemned is entitled to
receive therefor.
Page 16 of 16
XXXX 2/4/2025 2:40 PM Jacketed